Washington statutes.
RCW 10.27.150

Indictments—Issuance.

After hearing, examining, and investigating the evidence before it, a grand jury may, in its discretion, issue an indictment against a principal. A grand jury shall find an indictment only when from all the evidence at least three-fourths of the jurors are convinced that there is probable cause to believe a principal is guilty of a criminal offense. When an indictment is found by a grand jury the foreperson or acting foreperson shall present it to the court.

[ 2010 c 8 s 1026; 1971 ex.s. c 67 s 15.]